Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.750

Rules—Rule development process.

The director shall adopt rules necessary to allow the marketplace to operate as authorized by this subchapter. As part of the rule development process, the director shall consult with organizations representing eligible employers, qualified employees, private and nonprofit sector retirement plan administrators and providers, organizations representing private sector financial services firms, and any other individuals or entities that the director determines relevant to the development of an effective and efficient method for operating the marketplace. The director or the director's designee may take the actions necessary to ensure chapter 69, Laws of 2017 is implemented on July 23, 2017.

[ 2017 c 69 s 2; 2015 c 296 s 9.]